en: Ammunition
xx: Ammunition
cs: Munice
da: Ammunition
de: Munition
es: Munición
fr: Munitions, Balle (tir sportif), Douille usagée
it: Munizioni
ja: 銃弾
nl: Munitie
no: Ammunisjon
pl: Amunicja
pt: Munição
ru: Патроны
sv: Ammunition
tr: Cephane

en: Ammunition Cases & Holders
xx: Ammunition Cases & Holders
cs: Pouzdra na munici
da: Ammunitionskasser og -bælter
de: Munitionskisten & -halter
es: Estuches y fundas para munición
fr: Étuis et supports pour munitions
it: Custodie e contenitori di munizioni
ja: 弾薬ケース・ホルダー
nl: Munitiekisten en -houders
no: Oppbevaring av ammunisjon
pl: Etui na amunicję
pt: Caixas e suportes de munição
ru: Кейсы и держатели для патронов
sv: Ammunitionsväskor och -hållare
tr: Silah Kılıfları ve Askıları

en: Gun Cases & Range Bags
xx: Gun Cases & Range Bags
cs: Kufříky a brašny na střelné zbraně a náboje
da: Våben- og ammunitionstasker
de: Waffenkoffer und -taschen
es: Fundas y maletas para armas
fr: Étuis à revolver et sacs de rangement
it: Custodie per pistole e borse da poligono
ja: ガン ケース、ガン レンジ バッグ
nl: Wapenkoffers en schiettassen
no: Våpenkofferter og -vesker
pl: Pokrowce na broń i akcesoria
pt: Maletas e bolsas para armas
ru: Чехлы\, кейсы и сумки для оружия
sv: Vapenfodral och -väskor
tr: Silah Kılıfları ve Atış Çantaları

en: Gun Cleaning
xx: Gun Cleaning
cs: Čištění zbraní
da: Rengøring af skydevåben
de: Schusswaffenreinigung
es: Limpieza de armas
fr: Nettoyage d'armes
it: Pulizia delle pistole
ja: 銃のクリーニング
nl: Vuurwapenreiniging
no: Våpenrengjøring
pl: Czyszczenie broni
pt: Limpeza de armas
ru: Принадлежности для чистки огнестрельного оружия
sv: Eldvapenrengöring
tr: Silah Temizliği

en: Gun Cleaning Cloths & Swabs
xx: Gun Cleaning Cloths & Swabs
cs: Hadříky na čištění zbraní
da: Rengøring af våben - klude
de: Schusswaffen-Reinigungstücher
es: Paños de limpieza para armas de fuego
fr: Chiffons de nettoyage d'armes
it: Panni e scovoli per la pulizia delle armi
ja: 銃用クリーニングクロス
nl: Reinigingsdoeken voor vuurwapens
no: Rengjøringskluter og vattpinner til våpen
pl: Flejtuchy
pt: Panos e cotonetes para limpeza de armas
ru: Ветошь для чистки огнестрельного оружия
sv: Rengöringsduk för vapen
tr: Silah Temizleme Bezleri

en: Gun Cleaning Patches
xx: Gun Cleaning Patches
cs: Vytěráky na čištění zbraní
da: Rengøring af våben - pads
de: Schusswaffen-Reinigungspatches
es: Parches de limpieza de armas de fuego
fr: Patchs de nettoyage d'armes
it: Pezzuole per la pulizia delle armi
ja: 銃用クリーニングパッチ
nl: Wapendoekjes
no: Rengjøringslapper til våpen
pl: Przecieraki
pt: Esponjas para limpeza de armas
ru: Тампоны для чистки огнестрельного оружия
sv: Läsklappar för vapenrengöring
tr: Silah Temizleme Mendilleri

en: Gun Cleaning Solvents
xx: Gun Cleaning Solvents
cs: Rozpouštědla na čištění zbraní
da: Rengøring af våben - opløsningsmidler
de: Schusswaffen-Reinigungsmittel
es: Disolventes de limpieza de armas de fuego
fr: Solvants de nettoyage d'armes
it: Solventi per la pulizia delle armi
ja: 銃用クリーニング溶剤
nl: Reinigingsmiddelen voor vuurwapens
no: Rengjøringsmidler til våpen
pl: Rozpuszczalniki do czyszczenia broni
pt: Solventes para limpeza de armas
ru: Растворители для чистки огнестрельного оружия
sv: Solventer för vapenrengöring
tr: Silah Temizleme Solventleri

en: Gun Grips
xx: Gun Grips
cs: Rukojeti zbraní
da: Pistolgreb
de: Schusswaffengriffe
es: Empuñaduras para pistolas
fr: Poignées de revolver
it: Impugnature pistole
ja: 銃把
nl: Grepen voor vuurwapens
no: Pistolgrep
pl: Rękojeści broni palnej
pt: Culatras
ru: Рукоятки для огнестрельного оружия
sv: Pistolgrepp
tr: Silah Kabzaları

en: Gun Holsters
xx: Gun Holsters
cs: Pouzdra na zbraně
da: Pistolhylstre
de: Pistolentaschen
es: Fundas de pistola
fr: Étuis de revolver
it: Fondine pistole
ja: ガンホルスター
nl: Vuurwapenholsters
no: Pistolhylstre
pl: Kabury
pt: Coldres para armas
ru: Кобуры для огнестрельного оружия
sv: Hölster
tr: Silah Kılıfları

en: Gun Lights
xx: Gun Lights
cs: Svítilny ke střelným zbraním
da: Pistollygter
de: Waffenleuchten
es: Linternas para pistolas
fr: Lampes pour armes
it: Luci per pistole
ja: ガンライト
nl: Pistoollampen
no: Våpenlykt
pl: Latarki na broń palną
pt: Luzes de arma
ru: Целеуказатели для ружья
sv: Vapenlampor
tr: Silah Lambaları

en: Gun Rails
xx: Gun Rails
cs: Zásobníky ke zbraním
da: Pistolløb
de: Picatinny-Schienen
es: Monturas de riel
fr: Canons à rails
it: Rastrelliere armi
ja: ガンレール
nl: Sleden voor vuurwapens
no: Forskjefter til våpen
pl: Szyny montażowe
pt: Canhões elétricos
ru: Направляющие для огнестрельного оружия
sv: Vapenskenor
tr: Silah Rayları

en: Gun Slings
xx: Gun Slings
cs: Popruhy na střelné zbraně
da: Bæreremme til våben
de: Schusswaffengurte
es: Correas portafusiles
fr: Bretelles pour armes
it: Tracolle per armi
ja: ガンスリング
nl: Wapenriemen
no: Skulderreim til våpen
pl: Pasy do broni
pt: Correias para armas
ru: Ремни для огнестрельного оружия
sv: Axelremmar för gevär
tr: Silah Kayışları

en: Reloading Supplies & Equipment
xx: Reloading Supplies & Equipment
cs: Přebíjecí vybavení a materiál
da: Tilbehør og forsyninger til genladning
de: Material & Ausrüstung zum Nachladen von Schusswaffen
es: Productos y accesorios de recarga
fr: Accessoires et équipements pour le rechargement
it: Attrezzature e accessori per ricarica
ja: リロード用品・器具
nl: Herlaadmateriaal en -apparatuur
no: Ladeutstyr
pl: Artykuły i sprzęt związany z elaboracją amunicji
pt: Acessórios e equipamentos de recarga
ru: Оборудование и материалы для перезарядки патронов
sv: Tillbehör och utrustning för omladdning
tr: Yedek Cephane ve Ekipmanları

en: Ammunition Reloading Presses
xx: Ammunition Reloading Presses
cs: Přebíjecí lisy
da: Presse til genopfyldning af ammunition
de: Ladepressen
es: Prensas de recarga de munición
fr: Presses pour le rechargement de munitions
it: Presse per ricarica di munizioni
ja: 銃弾リローディングプレス
nl: Herlaadpersen voor munitie
no: Ladepresse for ammunisjon
pl: Prasy elaboracyjne
pt: Prensas para recarga de munição
ru: Станки для перезарядки патронов
sv: Laddningspressar för ammunition
tr: Mühimmat Doldurma Presleri

en: Guns
xx: Guns
cs: Střelné zbraně
da: Pistoler
de: Schusswaffen
es: Pistolas
fr: Armes à feu
it: Pistole
ja: 銃
nl: Vuurwapens
no: Skytevåpen
pl: Broń palna
pt: Pistolas
ru: Огнестрельное оружие
sv: Eldvapen
tr: Ateşli Silahlar

en: Mace & Pepper Spray
xx: Mace & Pepper Spray
cs: Slzné a pepřové spreje
da: Peberspray
de: Tränengas & Pfefferspray
es: Aerosoles de defensa personal
fr: Bombes et sprays au poivre
it: Gas lacrimogeno e spray al pepe
ja: 催涙スプレー
nl: Traangas en pepper spray
no: Tåregass og pepperspray
pl: Rozpylacze obronne
pt: Spray de pimenta
ru: Газовые баллончики
sv: Mace- och pepparspray
tr: Mace ve Biber Gazı Spreyleri

en: Nunchucks
xx: Nunchucks
cs: Nunčaky
da: Nunchaku
de: Nunchakus
es: Nunchacos
fr: Nunchakus
it: Nunchuk
ja: ヌンチャク
nl: Nunchucks
no: Nunchaku
pl: Nunczaka
pt: Nunchaku
ru: Нунчаки
sv: Nunchaku
tr: Nunçakular

en: Spears
xx: Spears
cs: Kopí a halapartny
da: Spyd
de: Speerwaffen
es: Lanzas
fr: Lances
it: Lance
ja: 槍
nl: Speren
no: Lanser
pl: Włócznie
pt: Lanças e azagaias
ru: Копья
sv: Spjut
tr: Mızraklar

en: Staff & Stick Weapons
xx: Staff & Stick Weapons
cs: Tyčové a obuškové zbraně
da: Køller og stavvåben
de: Hieb- und Stichwaffen
es: Báculos y mazas
fr: Matraques et bâtons
it: Bastoni e armi ad asta
ja: 戦闘用杖
nl: Stokwapens
no: Stang- og stavvåpen
pl: Pałki do sztuk walki
pt: Armas de bastão
ru: Дубинки и палки
sv: Stav- och stickvapen
tr: Sopa ve Çubuk Silahlar

en: Stun Guns & Tasers
xx: Stun Guns & Tasers
cs: Paralyzátory a tasery
da: Strømpistoler
de: Elektroschockpistolen & Taser-Waffen
es: Armas eléctricas
fr: Pistolets paralysants et tasers
it: Pistole stordenti e taser
ja: スタンガン・テーザー銃
nl: Stunguns en tasers
no: Elektrosjokkvåpen og taser-våpen
pl: Paralizatory
pt: Armas imobilizadoras
ru: Электрошокеры и тазеры
sv: Chockpistoler och projektilskjutande elchockvapen
tr: Şok Tabancaları